District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Education Reports Simplification Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 4046 of the Schools Modernization Amendment Act of 2005, effective
October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.45(a)), is repealed.
Sec. 3. Section 702 of the Public School Enrollment Census Act of 1998, effective March
26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-175; D.C. Official Code § 38-159), is repealed.
Sec. 4. The Pre-k Enhancement and Expansion Amendment Act of 2008, effective July
18, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-202; D.C. Official Code § 38-271.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase " December 30" and inserting
the phrase “May 15” in its place; and


(2) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
“(f) The annual reports required by subsection (e) of this section, section 104, and section
105(a) may be submitted to the Council by May 15 annually as one report.”.
(b) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.04) is amended by striking the phrase
"December 30" and inserting the phrase “May 15” in its place.
(c) Section 105(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-271.05(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“December 30,” and inserting the phrase “May 15” in its place.
Sec. 5. The lead-in language of section 15c of the District of Columbia Nonresident
Tuition Act, effective May 9, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-126; D.C. Official Code § 38-312.03), is
amended by striking the phrase “and on an annual basis thereafter” and inserting the phrase “and
on an annual basis thereafter; provided, that, beginning in calendar year 2026, the report shall be
due on September 15 and on an annual basis thereafter.”.
Sec. 6. Section 3 of the District of Columbia Board of Education Leasing Authority Act
of 1982, effective September 29, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-158; D.C. Official Code § 38-401.01), is
repealed.
Sec. 7. Section 504 of the Raising the Expectations for Education Outcomes Omnibus
Act of 2012, effective June 19, 2012, (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-755.04), is
amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
period in its place.
(2) Paragraph (4) is repealed.


Sec. 8 Section 602(d) of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C.
Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-826.02(d)), is amended by striking the phrase “within 30
days of receipt.” and inserting the phrase “by March 15 of each year.”.
Sec. 9. Section 2(c) of the DCPS Digital Equity Act of 2022, effective December 13, 2022
(D.C. Law 24-191, D.C. Official Code § 38-831.21(e)), is repealed.
Sec. 10. Section 404 of the District of Columbia Public Higher Education Reorganization
Act, approved October 26, 1974, (88 Stat. 1430; D.C. Official Code § 38-1204.04), is amended
by striking the phrase “The Trustees shall make an annual report to the general public, Mayor,
Council, and the Congress” and inserting the phrase “The Trustees shall make an annual report
available to the general public, Mayor, and the Congress, and shall submit an annual report to the
Council”.
Sec. 11. Section 4025(b)(2) of the Higher Education Financial Aid Assistance Act of
2006, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 38-2734(b)(2)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(2) The name of each institution receiving funding from the DC Tuition Assistance
Grant Program, the number of students enrolled at each institution receiving funding from the
DC Tuition Assistance Grant Program, the amount of funding from the DC Tuition Assistance
Grant Program that each institution has received, and the enrollment status and graduation rates
of students receiving DC Tuition Assistance Grant Program funding.”.
Sec. 12. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 13. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).